dev/xfst2apertium.useless.generation.twol
! This file turns
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+Use/Sub+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+Use/Sub+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+Use/Sub+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgiella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgiella+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgiella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Acc
! into
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sápmi+SgGenCmp+PlGenCmp+N+SgGenCmp#giella+N+Sg+Acc
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Gen
!    sámegiela       sáme#giella+N+Sg+Acc
! and
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđu+N+SgNomCmp+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgeađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđo+Use/Sub+Use/Circ#+Use/Circgeađgi+N+Pl+Nom
! into
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđu+N+SgNomCmp#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom
!    vuođđogeađggit  vuođđo#geađgi+N+Pl+Nom

Alphabet

%-
%+PrsPrc
%+CLB
%+Ord
%+Foc%/ge
%+Foc%/naj
%+Foc%/han
%+Foc%/ba
%+Num
%+Qst
%+Sg

%+Last:0
%+Use%/NG:0
%+Use%/Ped:0
%+Use%/Sub:0
%+Use%/Circ:0
%+Use%/CircN:0
%+Use%/Marg:0
%+Dial%/%-KJ:0
%+Dial%/%-GG:0
%+Dial%/%-GS:0
;


Sets

!%+Dial%/%-GG	
!%+Dial%/%-KJ	
!%+Dial%/%-GS	
Useless =
%+Last
!%+Use%/Ped	
%+Use%/Sub	
%+Use%/Marg	
%+Use%/NG	
;

UsuallyUseless =
%+Use%/Circ	
%+Use%/CircN	
;

! For Nonstandard, we remove the tag but keep the string
Nonstandard = 
%+Dial%/%-KJ
%+Dial%/%-GS
;

! For Nonstandard, we remove the tag __and__ the string
NonstandardPaths = 
%+Dial%/%-GG  !! <- this is not the standard form, trash it man!
;

AllowUse =
%+CLB
%+Foc%/ge
%+Foc%/naj
%+Foc%/han
%+Foc%/ba
%+Ord
%+Num
%+PrsPrc
%+Qst
;

Rules 


"Disallow all non-standard dialect forms from the generator (note: this file creates the sme analyser too, so non-standard forms will be disallowed there too)"
NonstandardPaths:0 /<= _ ;

"Delete tags for nonstandard"
Nonstandard:0 <=> _ ;


"Disallow Use-marked forms in some contexts"
UsuallyUseless:0 /<= # [ \AllowUse: ]* _ [ \AllowUse: ]* # ;


"Delete Use-tags etc. that we don't use"
Useless:0 <=> _ ; 
! Removing tags with hfst-substitute will give duplicate analyses, so
! we do it here instead

!"Remove Ipmil-"
!%- /<= _ # ;
